test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-muqdzhw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - muʼdžõ: # Verb 30 'eng /est sasida/fin' - full paradigm
     muʼdžõ+V+IV+Inf: muʼdžõ
     muʼdžõ+V+IV+Ger+Ine: muʼdžõs
     muʼdžõ+V+IV+Sup: muʼdžõm
     muʼdžõ+V+IV+Sup+Ine: muʼdžõmõs
     muʼdžõ+V+IV+Sup+Ela: muʼdžõmõst
     muʼdžõ+V+IV+Sup+Tra: muʼdžõmõks
     muʼdžõ+V+IV+Sup+Abe: muʼdžõmõt
     muʼdžõ+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: mudžūb
     muʼdžõ+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: muʼdžõt
     muʼdžõ+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: muʼdžõbõd
     muʼdžõ+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: mudžīz
     muʼdžõ+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [mudžīzt, mudžīztõ]
     muʼdžõ+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [mudžīzt, mudžīztõ]
     muʼdžõ+V+IV+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: muʼdž
     muʼdžõ+V+IV+Cond+Sg3: muʼdžõks
     muʼdžõ+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: muʼdž
     muʼdžõ+V+IV+Imprt+ConNeg: muʼdž
     muʼdžõ+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2: muʼdžõgid
     muʼdžõ+V+IV+Jus+Sg: muʼdžõg
     muʼdžõ+V+IV+Quo+Sg: muʼdžiji
     muʼdžõ+V+IV+ActPrfPrc+Sg: muʼdžõn
     muʼdžõ+V+IV+PssPrfPrc: muʼdždõd
